District of Columbia statutes.
47-3920

Effect of repealers and amendments.

(a)

The repeal or amendment by this act of any provision of law shall not affect any act done or any right accrued or accruing under the provision of law before September 20, 1989 or any suit or proceeding commenced before September 20, 1989, but all rights and liabilities under prior law shall continue and may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as if the repeal or amendment had not been made.

(b)

All offenses committed and all penalties incurred prior to September 20, 1989 under any provision of law repealed or amended, may be prosecuted and punished in the same manner and with the same effect as if this act had not been enacted.

History

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 24, 36 DCR 4723
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3920.

References in Text

“This act,” referred to in (a) and (b), is D.C. Law 8-26, which is primarily codified as § 47-3901 et seq.